Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.062

Optional entry of system by political subdivisions or associations of political subdivisions—Procedure—School districts declared employers and eligible employees members of system—Exception.

(1) The members and appointive and elective officials of any political subdivision or association of political subdivisions of the state may become members of the retirement system by the approval of the local legislative authority.

(2) On and after September 1, 1965, every school district of the state of Washington shall be an employer under this chapter. Every member of each school district who is eligible for membership under RCW 41.40.023 shall be a member of the retirement system and participate on the same basis as a person who first becomes a member through the admission of any employer into the retirement system on and after April 1, 1949, except that after August 31, 2000, school districts will no longer be employers for the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3.

[ 2000 c 247 s 106; 1998 c 341 s 602; 1995 c 286 s 4; 1991 c 35 s 93; 1971 ex.s. c 271 s 12; 1969 c 128 s 13; 1965 c 84 s 1; 1963 c 174 s 16; 1961 c 291 s 13; 1953 c 200 s 19; 1951 c 50 s 13; 1949 c 240 s 27; 1947 c 274 s 43; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-42. Formerly RCW 41.40.410.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 271: See note following RCW 41.32.260.

Severability—1969 c 128: See note following RCW 41.40.010.